Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 6 Public Assistance Act
40-6-9.
Assignment and subrogation for recovery of child, spousal and medical support rights.

An applicant for or recipient of public assistance under this chapter, or under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq., for and on behalf of himself or herself and for and on behalf of a child or children, shall be deemed, without the necessity of signing any document for purposes of recovery, to have made an assignment and given a right of subrogation to the executive office of health and human services and/or the department of human services, as applicable, of any and all rights and interests in any cause of action, past, present, or future, that the applicant or recipient may have against any person failing to, or obligated to, provide for the support, maintenance, and medical care of the applicant, recipient, and/or minor child or children, for the period of time that assistance is being paid by the executive office of health and human services and/or the department. The executive office of health and human services and/or the department shall be subrogated to any and all rights, title, and interest the applicant or recipient may have against any and all property belonging to the obligated or non-supporting person in the enforcement of any claim for child, spousal, and medical support, whether liquidated through court order or not. The applicant or recipient shall also be deemed, without the necessity of signing any document, to have appointed the executive office of health and human services and/or the department of human services as his or her true and lawful attorney in fact to act in his or her name, place, and stead to perform the specific act of instituting suit to establish paternity or secure support and medical care; collecting any and all amounts due and owing for child, spousal, and medical support; endorsing any and all drafts, checks, money orders, or other negotiable instruments representing support payments that are received by the executive office of health and human services and/or the department; and retaining any portion thereof permitted under federal and state statutes as reimbursement for financial, medical, and any other assistance previously paid to or for the recipient, child, or children.

An applicant for, or a recipient of, medical assistance provided by the executive office of health and human services and/or the department pursuant to this chapter or chapter 8 of this title or Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq., for and on behalf of himself or herself, and for and on behalf of any other person for whom he or she may legally assign rights to any medical support or any other medical care, shall be deemed, without the necessity of signing any document for purposes of reimbursement, to have made an assignment and given a right of subrogation to the executive office of health and human services and/or the department of human services of any and all rights and interests that he, she, or such other person may have: (1) To payment for any medical support; and (2) To any payment from any third party that has a legal liability to pay for care and services available and provided to the applicant or recipient. The executive office of health and human services and/or the department of human services shall, in accordance with this section and all applicable state and federal laws, be entitled to any payments by a third party to recover costs from the full amount of an applicant’s or recipient’s liability settlement(s). For this purpose, the executive office of health and human services may place a lien against an applicant’s or recipient’s liability settlement(s).

In addition to the assignments and subrogation rights provided in subsections (a) and (b) of this section, an applicant for, or a recipient of, financial assistance provided by the executive office of health and human services and/or department pursuant to this chapter, whenever the assistance is necessary by reason of accident, injury, or illness for which a third party may be liable, for and on behalf of himself or herself, and for and on behalf of any other person for whom he or she may legally act, shall be deemed, without the necessity of signing any document, to have assigned and subrogated to the executive office of health and human services and/or the department of human services, from amounts recovered or recoverable from any third party, an amount of money equal to the amount of financial assistance provided as a result of the accident, illness, or injury.

With respect to an assignment and subrogation rights established pursuant to this section, an applicant or recipient shall provide to the executive office of health and human services and/or the department of human services all relevant information regarding the assigned and subrogated rights, and shall execute any documents relating thereto, in accordance with rules and regulations to be adopted by the executive office of health and human services and/or the department.

With respect to any assignment and subrogation rights for medical or financial support or other recoveries under this section, the executive office of health and human services and/or the department of human services shall be considered to have acquired the rights of the individual to payment by any third party for the medical care and support, financial support, and other recoveries.

An applicant for, or a recipient of, medical assistance provided by the executive office of health and human services in accordance with chapter 8 of this title shall also be subject to the provisions of chapter 57.1 of title 27. Funds available to be paid for the payment of child support shall supersede any payment made pursuant to this chapter and chapter 57.1 of title 27.

The executive office of health and human services and/or the department of human services shall, in accordance with this section and all applicable state and federal laws, be entitled to any payments by a third party to recover costs from the full amount of an applicant’s or recipient’s liability settlement(s). For this purpose, the executive office of health and human services may place a lien against an applicant’s or recipient’s liability settlement(s). Nothing in these sections shall limit the executive office of health and human services and/or the department of human services from recovery, to the extent of the distribution, in accordance with all state and federal laws.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 13, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 99, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 129, § 20; P.L. 1996, ch. 131, § 20; P.L. 1996, ch. 132, § 20; P.L. 1996, ch. 133, § 20; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 11, § 4; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 19, § 2.

40-6-9.1.
Data matching — Healthcare coverages.

For purposes of this section, the term “medical assistance program” shall mean medical assistance provided in whole or in part by the department of human services pursuant to chapters 5.1, 8, 8.4 of this title, 12.3 of title 42 and/or Title XIX or XXI of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq. and 42 U.S.C. § 1397aa et seq., respectively. Any references to the department shall be to the department of human services.

In furtherance of the assignment of rights to medical support to the department of human services under §

40-6-9(b)

, (c), (d), and (e), and in order to determine the availability of other sources of healthcare insurance or coverage for beneficiaries of the medical assistance program, and to determine potential third-party liability for medical assistance paid out by the department, all health insurers, health-maintenance organizations, including managed care organizations, and third-party administrators, self-insured plans, pharmacy benefit managers (PBM), and other parties that are by statute, contract, or agreement, legally responsible for payment of a claim for a healthcare item of service doing business in the state of Rhode Island shall permit and participate in data matching with the department of human services, as provided in this section, to assist the department to identify medical assistance program applicants, beneficiaries, and/or persons responsible for providing medical support for applicants and beneficiaries who may also have healthcare insurance or coverage in addition to that provided, or to be provided, by the medical assistance program and to determine any third-party liability in accordance with this section.

The department shall take all reasonable measures to determine the legal liability of all third parties (including health insurers, self-insured plans, group health plans (as defined in § 607(1) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 [29 U.S.C. § 1167(1)]), service benefit plans, health-maintenance organizations, managed care organizations, pharmacy benefit managers, or other parties that are, by statute, contract, or agreement, legally responsible for payment of a claim for a healthcare item or service), to pay for care and services on behalf of a medical assistance recipient, including collecting sufficient information to enable the department to pursue claims against such third parties.

In any case where such a legal liability is found to exist and medical assistance has been made available on behalf of the individual (beneficiary), the department shall seek reimbursement for the assistance to the extent of the legal liability and in accordance with the assignment described in §

40-6-9

.

To the extent that payment has been made by the department for medical assistance to a beneficiary in any case where a third party has a legal liability to make payment for the assistance, and to the extent that payment has been made by the department for medical assistance for healthcare items or services furnished to an individual, the department (state) is considered to have acquired the rights of the individual to payment by any other party for the healthcare items or services in accordance with §

40-6-9

.

Any health insurer (including a group health plan, as defined in § 607(1) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 [29 U.S.C. § 1167(1)], a self-insured plan, a service-benefit plan, a managed care organization, a pharmacy benefit manager, or other party that is, by statute, contract, or agreement, legally responsible for payment of a claim for a healthcare item or service), in enrolling an individual, or in making any payments for benefits to the individual or on the individual’s behalf, is prohibited from taking into account that the individual is eligible for, or is provided, medical assistance under a plan under 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq. for this state, or any other state.

All health insurers, including, but not limited to, health-maintenance organizations, third-party administrators, nonprofit medical-service corporations, nonprofit hospital-service corporations, subject to the provisions of chapters 18, 19, 20, and 41 of title 27, as well as, self-insured plans, group health plans (as defined in § 607(1) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 [29 U.S.C. § 1167(1)]), service-benefit plans, managed care organizations, pharmacy benefit managers, or other parties that are, by statute, contract, or agreement, legally responsible for payment of a claim for a healthcare item or service) doing business in this state shall:

Provide member information within fourteen (14) calendar days of the request to the department to enable the medical assistance program to identify medical assistance program recipients, applicants and/or persons responsible for providing medical support for those recipients and applicants who are, or could be, enrollees or beneficiaries under any individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy available or in force and effect in the state;

With respect to individuals who are eligible for, or are provided, medical assistance by the department, upon the request of the department, provide member information within fourteen (14) calendar days of the request to determine during what period the individual or his or her spouse or dependents may be (or may have been) covered by a health insurer and the nature of the coverage that is, or was provided by the health insurer (including the name, address, and identifying number of the plan);

Accept the state’s right of recovery and the assignment to the state of any right of an individual or other entity to payment from the party for an item or service for which payment has been made by the department;

Respond to any inquiry by the department regarding a claim for payment for any healthcare item or service that is submitted not later than three (3) years after the date of the provision of the healthcare item or service; and

Agree not to deny a claim submitted by the state based solely on procedural reasons, such as on the basis of the date of submission of the claim, the type or format of the claim form, or a failure to present proper documentation at the point-of-sale that is the basis of the claim, if—

The claim is submitted by the state within the three-year (3) period beginning on the date on which the item or service was furnished; and

Any action by the state to enforce its rights with respect to the claim is commenced within six (6) years of the state’s submission of such claim.

This information shall be made available by these insurers and health-maintenance organizations and used by the department of human services only for the purposes of, and to the extent necessary for, identifying these persons, determining the scope and terms of coverage, and ascertaining third-party liability. The department of human services shall provide information to the health insurers, including health insurers, self-insured plans, group health plans (as defined in § 607(1) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 [29 U.S.C. § 1167(1)]), service-benefit plans, managed care organizations, pharmacy benefit managers, or other parties that are, by statute, contract, or agreement, legally responsible for payment of a claim for a healthcare item or service) only for the purposes described herein.

No health insurer, health-maintenance organization, or third-party administrator that provides, or makes arrangements to provide, information pursuant to this section shall be liable in any civil or criminal action or proceeding brought by beneficiaries or members on account of this action for the purposes of violating confidentiality obligations under the law.

The department shall submit any appropriate and necessary state plan provisions.

The department of human services is authorized and directed to promulgate regulations necessary to ensure the effectiveness of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 35, § 3; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 18, § 4; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 17, § 15.

40-6-10.
Effect of assistance on receipt of workers’ compensation benefits.

No individual shall be entitled to receive assistance provided under this chapter or chapter 5.1 of this title and/or medical assistance under chapter 8 of this title for any period beginning on or after July 1, 1982, with respect to which benefits are paid or payable to individuals under any workers’ compensation law of this state, any other state, or the federal government, on account of any disability caused by accident or illness. In the event that workers’ compensation benefits are subsequently awarded to an individual with respect to which the individual has received assistance payments under this chapter or chapter 5.1 of this title and/or medical assistance under chapter 8 of this title, then the executive office of health and human services shall be subrogated to the individual’s rights in the award to the extent of the amount of the payments and/or medical assistance paid to or on behalf of the individuals.

Whenever an employer or insurance carrier has been notified by the executive office of health and human services that an individual is an applicant for, or a recipient of, assistance payments under this chapter or chapter 5.1 of this title, and/or medical assistance under chapter 8 of this title, for a period during which the individual is or may be eligible for benefits under the workers’ compensation act, chapters 29 — 38 of title 28, the notice shall constitute a lien in favor of the executive office of health and human services, upon any pending award, order, or settlement to the individual under the workers’ compensation act. The employer, or his or her insurance carrier, shall be required to reimburse the executive office of health and human services the amount of the assistance payments and/or medical assistance paid to or on behalf of the individual for any period for which an award, order, or settlement is made.

Whenever an individual becomes entitled to or is awarded workers’ compensation for the same period with respect to which the individual has received assistance payments under this chapter or chapter 5.1 of this title and/or medical assistance under chapter 8 of this title, and whenever notice of the receipt of assistance payments has been given to the division of workers’ compensation of the department of labor and training of this state and/or the workers’ compensation commission, the division or commission is hereby required to and shall incorporate, in any award, order, or approval of settlement, an order requiring the employer or his or her insurance carrier to reimburse the executive office of health and human services the amount of the assistance payments and/or medical assistance paid to, or on behalf of, the individual for the period for which an award, order, or settlement is made.

Any claims or payments to a recipient of medical assistance provided by the executive office of health and human services in accordance with chapter 8 of this title shall also be subject to the provisions of §

28-33-27

. Funds available to be paid for the payment of child support shall supersede any payment made pursuant to this chapter and chapter 57.1 of title 27.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 13, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 129, § 20; P.L. 1996, ch. 131, § 20; P.L. 1996, ch. 132, § 20; P.L. 1996, ch. 133, § 20; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 11, § 4; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 27.

40-6-11.
Report of income by recipients.

If at any time during the continuance of public assistance pursuant to this chapter and/or chapter 8 of this title, the recipient thereof becomes possessed of income or resources in excess of the amount previously reported by him or her, it shall be his or her duty, and a condition of eligibility, to notify the department providing assistance of this fact immediately on the receipt or possession of additional income or resources.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 13, § 2.

40-6-12.
Records as to assistance.

All records pertaining to the administration of public assistance pursuant to this chapter and chapter 8 of this title are hereby declared to constitute confidential matter. It shall be unlawful for any person to make use of, or cause to be used, any information contained in records for purposes not directly connected with the administration thereof, except with the consent of the individual concerned.

The director of the department shall have the power to establish rules and regulations governing the custody, use, and preservation of the records, papers, files, and communications dealing with the administration of public assistance. The rules and regulations shall have the same force and effect as law. The records shall be produced in response to subpoena duces tecum properly issued by any federal or state court; provided, however, that the purpose for which the subpoena is sought is directly connected with the administration of public assistance. No subpoena shall be issued by a court asking either for the records, or for persons having custody or access to the records, unless the litigation involved in such matters is directly connected with the administration of public assistance.

Any person, who by law is entitled to a list of individuals receiving any of the assistance as provided in this section, shall not publish, or cause to be published, the list except by the express consent of the director of the department, or to make use thereof for purposes not directly connected with the administration thereof. Any person violating any of the provisions of this section, or the lawful rules and regulations made pursuant to this section, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be fined not more than two hundred dollars ($200) or shall be imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to prohibit the director of the department, or his or her agents duly authorized for that purpose, from issuing any statistical material or data, or publishing, or causing the data to be published, whenever he or she shall deem it to be in the public interest. The director of the department may inquire into the records of any state department or agency in the course of his or her administration of public assistance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 13, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 127; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 17.

40-6-12.1.
Warrants — Release of information.

The department of human services shall provide to the statewide warrant squad the current address of any individual if all of the following conditions are met:

There is an outstanding arrest warrant or body attachment issued by a state court in Rhode Island for the individual; and

The individual is a fugitive felon as defined by the department in accordance with 42 U.S.C. § 608(a)(9); and

The individual is receiving general public assistance, or cash assistance under chapter 5.1 of this title either for himself or herself or his or her dependents; and

The law enforcement officer seeking the information certifies in writing that an attempt by the warrant squad to locate and apprehend that individual has been unsuccessful; and

The warrant squad provides the department the name, date of birth, and social security number of the individual.

If all the above conditions are met, the department shall release the address upon the request and certification of the officer, and a release pursuant to this section shall not constitute a violation of §§

40-6-12

, 40-5.1-31 [repealed], or

38-2-2(4)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 300, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 129, § 21; P.L. 1996, ch. 131, § 21; P.L. 1996, ch. 132, § 21; P.L. 1996, ch. 133, § 21.

40-6-13.
Appeals — Hearings.

Any applicant or recipient aggrieved because of a decision by the department or delay in making a decision shall be entitled to an appeal and shall be afforded reasonable notice and opportunity for a hearing. Hearings with respect to public assistance shall be conducted by the department.

With respect to general public assistance benefits, advance notice of the department’s intended action to deny, terminate, reduce, or suspend benefits shall be in writing and mailed to an applicant or recipient at his or her last known or designated address at least ten (10) day(s) prior to the effective date of its intended action; the recipient shall be afforded an administrative hearing to contest the department’s intended action; provided, that the applicant or recipient makes a written request for a hearing and provided that the written request is received by the department within ten (10) days of the mailing date of the department’s notice to the applicant or recipient; and provided further, that the department shall continue payment of general public-assistance benefits, pending a hearing, to a recipient who includes a written request for continuation of benefits in or with the recipient’s timely filed written request for a hearing in accordance with this subsection.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 13, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 25, § 1.

40-6-14.
Assistance not assignable — Exemption from process.

Public assistance provided under this chapter shall not be transferable or assignable, at law or in equity, and none of the money paid or payable under this chapter shall be subject to execution, levy, attachment, garnishment, or other legal process, or to the operation of any bankruptcy or insolvency law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 13, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 46, § 1.

40-6-15.
Fraudulently obtaining assistance.

Any person who by any fraudulent device obtains, or attempts to obtain, or aids or abets any person to obtain, public assistance, pursuant to this chapter, to which he or she is not entitled, or who willfully fails to report income or resources as provided in this chapter, shall be guilty of larceny and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment of not more than five (5) years or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both, if the value of the public assistance to which he or she is not entitled shall exceed five hundred dollars ($500); or by imprisonment by less than one year or by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or by both, if the value of the public assistance to which he or she is not entitled shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 13, § 2.

40-6-16.
Fraudulent use of food stamps.

Any person who by any fraudulent device obtains, or attempts to obtain, or aids or abets any person to obtain, food stamps issued pursuant to the Food Stamp Act of 1964, as amended, 7 U.S.C. § 2011 et seq., shall be guilty of larceny, and upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment of not more than five (5) years or by fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both, if the value of the food stamps to which one is not entitled shall exceed five hundred dollars ($500); or by imprisonment by less than one year or by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or both, if the value of the food stamps to which one is not entitled, shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500).

Upon conviction of the felony or misdemeanor, the individual shall be ineligible to participate in the food stamp program for not less than six (6) and not more than twenty-four (24) months, as determined by the court; provided, that the disqualification applies only to the individual so convicted and does not render the entire household ineligible for the program.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 13, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 17.

40-6-17.
Receipt and use of federal funds.

The state shall have authority to receive and expend through the department any funds that may become available from the federal government for public assistance purposes. The department, with the approval of the governor, shall have authority to meet federal requirements with respect to the administration of funds as may be set forth as conditions precedent to receiving the federal funds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 13, § 2.

40-6-18.
Agreements with other states.

The department shall have the authority to enter into reciprocal agreements with other states and territories of the United States providing for the payment of assistance to former residents of this state residing in other states.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 13, § 2.

40-6-19.
Complainant in actions to invoke penalties.

The director of the department, or any person designated by him or her, may be the party complainant to any complaint and warrant brought to invoke the penalties provided for in this chapter, and the party complainant shall be exempt from giving surety for costs in any action.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 13, § 2.

40-6-20.
Prosecution of criminal actions.

All criminal actions for any violation of this chapter, or any rule or regulation promulgated under this chapter pertaining to the department, shall be prosecuted by the attorney general or by any qualified member of the Rhode Island bar who shall be designated by the director and approved by the attorney general to institute and prosecute such actions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 13, § 2.

40-6-21.
Child support — Income tax refund offset.

The department is authorized and directed to promulgate rules and regulations to implement the federal and state programs for offset and collection of past-due child and spousal support from income tax refunds, as authorized by Sections 6305(b) and 6402(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. §§ 6305(b) and 6402(c), and implementing regulations, and as authorized by chapter 30.1 of title 44. The rules and regulations shall provide the child support obligor with an opportunity for an administrative hearing to contest the offset.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 13, § 2.

40-6-21.1.
Voluntary acknowledgement of paternity — Hospital-based program.

The department of human services is authorized and directed to establish, in accordance with the requirements of Title IV-D, § 466(a)(5) of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 666(a)(5), a hospital-based program for the voluntary acknowledgement of paternity during the period immediately preceding or following the birth of a child. The department of human services shall require all public and private birthing hospitals in this state, as defined herein, to participate in the hospital-based paternity acknowledgement program and to provide the services, materials, and reports as may be required by federal law and regulations. The program must be operational in hospitals no later than January 1, 1995. The department is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement the hospital-based program and to enter into cooperative agreements with other state agencies to effectuate the program.

The requirement for participation in the program by hospitals is in addition to the birth-registration requirements under chapter 3 of title 23; provided, however, that the department of human services shall work in cooperation with the department of health, registrar of vital records, to avoid duplication of obligations imposed on hospitals to the extent permitted by federal law and regulations.

The term “birthing hospital” means a hospital that has a licensed obstetric care unit or is licensed to provide obstetric services, or a licensed birthing center associated with a hospital. A birthing center is a facility outside a hospital that provides maternity services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 236, § 3.

40-6-21.2.
Child medical support garnishment — State income tax offset.

The department of human services may garnish the wages, salary, or other income of, and withhold amounts from state income tax refunds due to, any person who:

Is required by court or administrative order to provide coverage of the cost of health services to a child eligible for medical assistance under chapter 8 of this title and Title XIX of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.; and

Has received payment from a third party for the costs of the services but has not used the payments to reimburse either the other parent or guardian of the child or the provider of the services, to the extent necessary to reimburse the department of human services for its costs, but claims for current and past-due child support shall take priority over these claims.

Garnishment proceedings may be commenced and enforced in the family court under chapters 5, 8, 9, 11 [repealed], 13, 15, and 16 of title 15.

Withholding from state income tax refunds shall be enforced in accordance with chapter 30.1 of title 44.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 237, § 3.

40-6-22.
Disclosure of information — Penalty.

For purposes of this section, a “financial institution” means a bank, savings bank, national bank, trust company, building and loan association, loan and investment company, credit union, safe deposit company, any person or corporation registered to sell securities under the provisions of chapter 11 of title 7, or federal savings and loan institution authorized to do business under the laws of this state.

A financial institution, upon written request or upon request made by computer file on magnetic tape, signed or submitted by an authorized employee of the department of human services, shall inform the department of the amount deposited in the financial institution to the credit of a person named in, or otherwise identified in, the request as an applicant for, or recipient of, public assistance under this chapter or chapter 8 of this title. Upon the request, the financial institution shall provide the requested deposit information, in writing or by computer file on magnetic tape, to the department of human services within sixty (60) days from the receipt of the request. The department shall not submit its information request by computer file on magnetic tape to a financial institution that does not maintain deposit information on computer files, and the financial institution shall not be required to provide deposit information by computer file on magnetic tape.

A financial institution shall be subject to a penalty of one hundred dollars ($100) for each willful failure to provide the department with the requested information. The department may recover the penalty by civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction.

The department of human services may disclose information obtained pursuant to this section to an agency or department of another state administering a public assistance program, provided that the department of human services has executed a reciprocal agreement with the agency or department for the reciprocal disclosure of deposit information.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 13, § 2.

40-6-23.
Release of wage and earnings information.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, every employer or payor of earnings shall make available to the department, upon written request by the department, any wage or earnings information in its possession, regarding an employee, former employee, or person providing goods or services who is a recipient, an applicant, or former recipient for assistance under the provisions of this chapter.

Any employer or payor who refuses to make available wage or earnings information shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or shall be imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 13, § 2.

40-6-24.
Recipient not deemed pauper.

No person receiving assistance under this chapter shall be deemed a pauper for purposes of chapter 5 of this title by reason thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 13, § 2.

40-6-25.
Rules and regulations.

The department is authorized to prescribe forms and promulgate rules and regulations that it deems necessary in order to effectuate the intent and provisions of this chapter. Furthermore, it is the legislative intent of the general assembly that the authority granted in this chapter to the department to promulgate rules and regulations, with respect to eligibility for assistance, amount, and standards of assistance and administration of programs, be liberally construed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 13, § 2.

40-6-26.
Severability.

If any provision in any section of this chapter, or the application thereof, to any person or circumstances is held invalid, its invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 13, § 2.